Washington statutes.
RCW 7.64.045

Plaintiff's duties upon issuance of order awarding possession of property.

After issuance of the order awarding possession, the plaintiff shall deliver a copy of the bond, unless waived by the court under RCW 7.64.035(1)(b), and a certified copy of the order awarding possession to the sheriff of the county where the property is located and shall provide the sheriff with all available information as to the location and identity of the defendant and the property claimed. If the property is returned to the plaintiff by the defendant or if the plaintiff otherwise obtains possession of the property, the plaintiff shall notify the sheriff of this fact as soon as possible.

[ 2004 c 74 s 3; 1990 c 227 s 4; 1979 ex.s. c 132 s 6.]